Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-501
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide a unified system of county courts for the state by combining the functions of county courts, justice of the peace courts, and police magistrate courts and to provide jurisdiction and procedure for the county courts that will effectively, efficiently, and economically meet the needs of the people of the State of Nebraska and of all other persons who may have business before the county courts.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 11.